California, session 20252026, AB2336.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17147 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17147. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, gross income does not include the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of overtime pay received during the taxable year.(b) This section shall remain operative only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 17147.1 is added to the Revenue and Taxation Code, to read:17147.1. (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2031, gross income does not include the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) received by a taxpayer as proceeds from a defined benefit plan, as defined in Section 414(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, during the taxable year.(b) This section shall remain operative only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3. For purposes of complying with Section 41 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as it related to the exclusions from income allowed by Sections 17147 and 17147.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as added by Sections 1 and 2 of this act, the Legislature finds and declares as follows:(a) The specific goal of the exclusions is to give financial support to those working extra hours to afford increasing costs and those on limited retirement income.(b) There is no available data to collect or report with respect to the exclusions.SEC. 4. This act provides for a tax levy within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect.